Hawaii, session 2025, GM1322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII;
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that there is currently a
statewide physician shortage. According to the federal Health
Resources and Services Administration, each county in the State
contains a region that is a medically underserved area, as
defined by the Public Health Service Act of 1944, Public Law
78-410.
The legislature further finds that pharmacists can help
bridge the gaps created by the physician shortage. A
pharmacist's skill set includes educating patients on how and
when to check blood sugar, ways to avoid and manage
hypoglycemia, how to take their medications correctly to avoid
adverse effects, and various medication utilization techniques.
Additionally, patients are significantly less likely to be
readmitted to the hospital when pharmacists provide clinical
services after a hospital discharge.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require private
and public health plans issued in the State to recognize
2025-2848 SB1245 GDI SMA.docx

Page 2 S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
licensed pharmacists as participating providers and mandate
payment or reimbursement for services provided by participating
registered pharmacists within their scope of practice to the
extent that the policy or plan provides coverage for the same
service rendered by another health care provider.
SECTION 2. Chapter 431, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to article lOA to be
appropriately designated and to read as follows:
"§431: lOA- Seirvicea provided by participating registered
pharmaeists; coverage. (a) Each individual or group policy of
accident and health or sickness insurance delivered or issued
for delivery in the State on or after July 1, 2026, shall:
(1) Recognize pharmacists licensed pursuant to chapter 461
as participating providers;
(2) Include coverage for a service provided by a
participating registered pharmacist practicing within
the scope of the participating registered pharmacist's
license for purposes of health maintenance or
treatment to the extent that the policy provides
coverage for the same service rendered by another
health care provider; and
2025-2848 SB1245 GDI SMA.docx

Page 3 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) Pa^^or rewbu£se a£h^raiaci st or£ha rmacy^or t^ie cost
of a service provided by a pharmacist within the scope
of the pharmacist's practice.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "participating
registered pharmacist" means a registered pharmacist licensed
pursuant to chapter 461 who has contracted with the insurer to
provide health care services to its insureds."
SECTION 3. Chapter 432, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to article 1 to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§432; 1- Se£vices£royided bj^paxticigaiting re2ister^
pharmacists; coverage. (a) Each individual or group hospital
or medical service plan contract delivered or issued for
delivery in the State on or after July 1, 2026, shall:
(1) Recognize pharmacists licensed pursuant to chapter 461
as participating providers;
(2) Provide coverage for a service provided by a
participating registered pharmacist practicing within
the scope of the participating registered pharmacist's
license for purposes of health maintenance or
treatment to the extent that the plan contract
2025-2848 SB1245 CDl SMA.docx

Page 4 S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
provides coverage for the same service rendered by
anothBr j2ecL]:tli ca re proyider2 ajid
(3) Pay or reimburse a pharmacist or pharmacy for the cost
of a service performed by a pharmacist within the
scope of the pharmacist's practice.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "participating
registered pharmacist" means a registered pharmacist licensed
pu^^suant to chapt^£££l who 2ia^£ont^^ct^d 2;zitli the matAJ^
benefit society to provide health care services to its
subscribers or members."
SECTION 4. Chapter 432D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§432D- Services provided by participating registered
pharmacists; coverage. (a) Each health maintenance
organization policy, contract, plan, or agreement that is
issued, amended, or renewed in the State on or after July 1,
2026, shall:
(1) Recognize pharmacists licensed pursuant to chapter 461
as participating providers;
2025-2848 SB1245 CDl SMA.docx

Page 5 S.B. NO. s"
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(2) Provide coverage for a service provided by a
participating registered pharmacist practicing within
the scope of the participating registered pharmacist's
license for purposes of health maintenance or
treatment to the extent that the plan contract
provides coverage for the same service rendered by
another health care provider; and
(3) Pay or reimburse a pharmacist or pharmacy for the cost
of a service provided by a pharmacist within the scope
of the pharmacist's practice.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "participating
registered pharmacist" means a registered pharmacist licensed
pursuant to chapter 461 who has contracted with the health
maintenance organization to provide health care services to its
enrollees or subscribers."
SECTION 5. Section 346-59, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) Rates of payment to providers of medical care who are
individual practitioners, including doctors of medicine,
dentists, podiatrists, psychologists, osteopaths, optometrists,
pharmacists, and other individuals providing services, shall be
2025-2848 SB1245 CDl SMA.docx

Page 6 S.B. NO.
CD. 1
based upon the Hawaii medicaid fee schedule. The amounts paid
shall not exceed the maximum permitted to be paid individual
practitioners or other individuals under federal law and
regulation, the medicare fee schedule for the current year, the
state limits as provided in the appropriation act, or the
provider's billed amount.
The appropriation act shall indicate the percentage of the
medicare fee schedule for the year 2000 to be used as the basis
for establishing the Hawaii medicaid fee schedule. For any
subsequent adjustments to the fee schedule, the legislature
shall specify the extent of the adjustment in the appropriation
act. "
SECTION 6. Section 346-59.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows:
"(g) For the purposes of this section:
"Distant site" means the location of the health care
provider delivering services through telehealth at the time the
services are provided.
"Health care provider" means a provider of services, as
defined in title 42 United States Code section 1395x(u), a
provider of medical and other health services, as defined in
2025-2848 SB1245 CDl SMA.docx

Page 7 1245
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
title 42 United States Code section 1395x(s), other
practitioners licensed by the State and working within their
scope of practice, and any other person or organization who
furnishes, bills, or is paid for health care in the normal
course of business, including but not limited to primary care
providers, mental health providers, oral health providers,
physicians and osteopathic physicians licensed under
chapter 453, advanced practice registered nurses licensed under
chapter 457, psychologists licensed under chapter 465,
pharmacists licensed under chapter 461, and dentists licensed
under chapter 448.
"Interactive telecommunications system" has the same
meaning as the term is defined in title 42 Code of Federal
Regulations section 410.78(a).
"Originating site" means the location where the patient is
located, whether accompanied or not by a health care provider,
at the time services are provided by a health care provider
through telehealth, including but not limited to a health care
provider's office, hospital, critical access hospital, rural
health clinic, federally qualified health center, a patient's
home, and other nonmedical environments such as school-based
2025-2848 SB1245 CDl SMA.docx

Page 8 S.B. NO.

'I
C.D. 1
health centers, university-based health centers, or the work
location of a patient.
"Telehealth" means the use of telecommunications services,
as defined in section 269-1, to encompass four modalities:
store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live
consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but not
be limited to real-time video conferencing-based communication,
secure interactive and non-interactive web-based communication,
and secure asynchronous information exchange, to transmit
patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality
digital images and laboratory results for medical interpretation
and diagnosis, for the purpose of delivering enhanced health
care services and information while a patient is at an
originating site and the health care provider is at a distant
site. Except as provided through an interactive
telecommunications system, standard telephone contacts,
facsimile transmissions, or e-mail text, in combination or
alone, do not constitute telehealth services."
SECTION 7. The department of human services shall apply to
the United States Department of Health and Human Services for
2025-2848 SB1245 CDl SMA.docx

Page 9 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
any amendment to the state medicaid plan or for any medicaid
waiver necessary to implement sections 5 and 6 of this Act.
SECTION 8. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 9. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 10. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that sections 5 and 6 shall take effect upon approval
of the Hawaii medicaid state plan by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services; provided further that the amendments made
to section 346-59.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, by section 6 of
this Act shall not be repealed when that section is reenacted on
December 31, 2025, pursuant to section 8 of Act 107, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2023.
2025-2848 SB1245 CDl SMA.docx 9

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI'I

S.B. No. 1245, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW AFI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1245, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives